New York, session 2025-2026, S5969.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 22.03 of the mental hygiene law, 2 as added by chapter 558 of the laws of 1999, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision (d) is added to read as follows: 4 (c) The director of every [chemical dependence] substance use disorder 5 program, service, or treatment facility shall post copies of [a notice] 6 the substance use disorder treatment bill of rights in a form and manner 7 to be determined by the commissioner, at places throughout the facility 8 or program where such [notice] bill of rights shall be conspicuous and 9 visible to all patients[, stating]. The substance use disorder treatment 10 bill of rights shall include, but need not be limited to, the following: 11 1. [a general statement of the rights of patients under the various 12 admission or retention provisions of this article; and 13 2. the right of the patient to communicate with the director, the 14 board of visitors, if any, and the commissioner] Every patient has the 15 right to participate in developing an individualized plan of treatment 16 and to request a review of the patient's treatment plan by another 17 clinician; 18 2. Every patient has the right to receive an explanation of services 19 in accordance with the patient's treatment plan; 20 3. Every patient shall have the right to be fully informed of the 21 patient's proposed treatment, including possible adverse effects; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00903-05-6 S. 5969--A 2 1 4. Every patient has the right to object to or terminate treatment 2 unless otherwise directed pursuant to court order, and cannot be coerced 3 into treatment; 4 5. Every patient has the right to privacy in treatment and in caring 5 for personal needs, to have confidentiality in the treatment of personal 6 and medical records, and to have security in storing possessions; 7 6. Every patient has the right to have access to the patient's treat- 8 ment records; 9 7. Every patient and provider shall treat each other in a mutually 10 courteous and fair way that is appropriate to the patient's individual 11 needs; 12 8. Every patient shall be treated in a manner that is free from abuse, 13 discrimination, mistreatment, and exploitation; 14 9. Every patient's civil and religious liberties, including the right 15 to independent personal decisions and knowledge of available choices, 16 shall not be infringed and facility or program staff shall encourage and 17 assist in the fullest exercise of these rights; and 18 10. Every patient shall be free to report grievances regarding 19 services or staff to a supervisor, director, the board of visitors, or 20 the commissioner. 21 (d) Every substance use disorder program, service, or facility shall 22 give a copy of the substance use disorder treatment bill of rights to 23 each patient at or prior to the time of admission, or to the appointed 24 representative at the time of appointment and to each member of the 25 staff at the program, service, or facility. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 27 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 28 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 29 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 30 completed on or before such effective date.